California, session 20252026, SB1127.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 89500 of the Education Code is amended to read:89500. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees shall provide by rule for the government of their appointees and employees, pursuant to this chapter and other applicable provisions of law, including, but not limited to: to, the following: appointment; classification; terms; duties; pay and overtime pay; uniform and equipment allowances; travel expenses and allowances; rates for housing and lodging; moving expenses; leave of absence; tenure; vacation; holidays; layoff; dismissal; demotion; suspension; sick leave; reinstatement; and employer’s contribution to employees’, annuitants’, and survivors’ the health benefits plans. benefit plans of employees, annuitants, and survivors.(2) The rules adopted by the trustees relating to tenure, layoff, dismissal, demotion, suspension, and reinstatement of academic and administrative employees shall be adopted on or before February 1, 1962, and become effective on July 1, 1962, with respect to employees who are academic teaching and administrative employees as defined in subdivision (1)(e) of Section 24301, as it read on June 30, 1961, as enacted by Section 3 of Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 1959.(b) The adoption of these rules and regulations shall not be subject to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(c) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that that, if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.